Vermont, session 2025-2026, H43.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5811 is amended to read:
§ 5811. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
VT LEG #378754 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.43
2025 Page 3 of 6
* * *
(21) “Taxable income” means, in the case of an individual, federal
adjusted gross income determined without regard to 26 U.S.C. § 168(k) and:
* * *
(B) decreased by the following items of income (to the extent such
income is included in federal adjusted gross income):
(i) income from U.S. government obligations;
(ii) with respect to adjusted net capital gain income as defined in
26 U.S.C. § 1(h) reduced by the total amount of any qualified dividend
income: either the first $5,000.00 of such adjusted net capital gain income or
40 percent of adjusted net capital gain income from the sale of assets held by
the taxpayer for more than three years, except not adjusted net capital gain
income from:
(I) the sale of any real estate or portion of real estate used by
the taxpayer as a primary or nonprimary residence; or
(II) the sale of depreciable personal property other than farm
property and standing timber; or stocks or bonds publicly traded or traded on
an exchange, or any other financial instruments; regardless of whether sold by
an individual or business; and provided that the total amount of decrease under
this subdivision (21)(B)(ii) shall not exceed 40 percent of federal taxable
income or $350,000.00, whichever is less;
VT LEG #378754 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.43
2025 Page 4 of 6
(iii) recapture of State and local income tax deductions not taken
against Vermont income tax;
(iv) the portion of certain retirement income and federally taxable
benefits received under the federal Social Security Act that is required to be
excluded under section 5830e of this chapter;
(v) the amount of any federal deduction or credit that the taxpayer
would have been allowed for the cultivation, testing, processing, or sale of
cannabis or cannabis products as authorized under 7 V.S.A. chapter 33 or 37,
but for 26 U.S.C. § 280E; and
(vi) the amount of interest paid by a qualified resident taxpayer
during the taxable year on a qualified education loan for the costs of attendance
at an eligible educational institution; and
(vii) U.S. military retirement income and U.S. military survivor
benefit income received by the surviving spouse or dependent of the deceased
service member; and
* * *
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
* * *
(c) Other contributory retirement systems; earnings not covered by Social
Security. Other retirement income, except U.S. military retirement income
VT LEG #378754 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.43
2025 Page 5 of 6
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, received by a taxpayer of this State
shall be excluded pursuant to subsection (b) of this section as though the
income were received from the Civil Service Retirement System and shall be
subject to the limitations under subsection (e) of this section, provided that:
(1) the income is received from a contributory annuity, pension,
endowment, or retirement system of:
(A) the U.S. government or a political subdivision or instrumentality
of the U.S. government;
(B) this State or a political subdivision or instrumentality of this
State; or
(C) another state or a political subdivision or instrumentality of
another state; and
(2) the contributory system from which the income is received was
based on earnings that were not covered by the Social Security Act.
(d) U.S. military retirement income. U.S. military retirement income
received by a taxpayer of this State shall be excluded pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section as though the income were received from the Civil Service
Retirement System and shall be subject to the limitations under subsection (e)
of this section. [Repealed.]
(e) Requirement to elect one exclusion. A taxpayer of this State who is
eligible during the taxable year for the Social Security income exclusion under
VT LEG #378754 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.43
2025 Page 6 of 6
subsection (a) of this section and any one or both of the exclusions under
subsections (b)–(d) and (c) of this section shall elect either one of the
exclusions for which the taxpayer is eligible under subsections (b) –(d) and (c)
of this section or the Social Security income exclusion under subsection (a) of
this section, but not both, for the taxable year. A taxpayer of this State who is
eligible during the taxable year for more than one of the both exclusions under
subsections (b) –(d) and (c) of this section shall elect only one of the
exclusions for which the taxpayer is eligible for the taxable year.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section shall take effect on passage.
(b) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Secs. 1 and 2 shall take effect
retroactively on January 1, 2026 and apply to taxable years on and after
January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #378754 v.1